Hawaii statutes.
§264-66 Authority to enter into agreements.
The director of transportation may enter into agreements with the council of
any county, or with the federal government, respecting the financing, planning,
establishment, improvement, maintenance, use, regulation, or vacation of
controlled-access facilities or other public highways, to facilitate the
purposes of this part. [L 1960, c 3, pt of §2; Supp, §111-48; HRS §264-66]

Revision Note

"Council" substituted for "board of
supervisors or councilmen" to conform to county charters.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next